Missouri, session 2026, HB1654.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.347, to read as follows:
1.347. 1. The Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Missouri
are the supreme law within the state of Missouri. No law, rule, regulation, or legal code
of any foreign government, international body, or religious system shall be applied or
enforced by any court, agency, or political subdivision of this state to the extent such
application would violate the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of
Missouri, or the public policy of this state.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or restrict the voluntary
expression, practice, or exercise of religion by any individual, group, or organization in
accordance with Article I, Section 5 of the Constitution of Missouri and the First
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
3. No person, organization, foreign power, or entity shall, through coercion,
threat, or use of force, attempt to impose or enforce any foreign or religious law upon
another person or group within the state of Missouri. Any violation of this subsection
shall be subject to criminal penalty under Missouri law including, but not limited to,
chapters 565 and 574.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1654 2
4. This section shall not impair or supersede obligations arising under the
Constitution of the United States, federal statutes, or treaties lawfully entered into by
the United States.
5. The attorney general of Missouri shall have concurrent authority with local
prosecutors to investigate and prosecute any action undertaken in violation of
subsection 3 of this section.
✔